Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.530

Rules, forms, orders—Administration of chapter.

(1) The director may make, amend, and repeal rules, forms, and orders when necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The director may appoint those persons within the department deemed necessary to administer this chapter. The director may delegate to such persons any powers, subject to the authority of the director, that may be necessary to carry out this chapter, including the issuance and processing of administrative proceedings and entering into stipulations under RCW 19.105.380.

[ 1988 c 159 s 27; 1982 c 69 s 25.]